Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-417
Discharge from youth rehabilitation and treatment center; considerations.

In determining whether to discharge a juvenile from a youth rehabilitation and treatment center, the Office of Juvenile Services shall consider whether (1) the juvenile has completed the goals of his or her individualized treatment plan or received maximum benefit from institutional treatment, (2) the juvenile would benefit from continued services under community supervision, (3) the juvenile can function in a community setting, (4) there is reason to believe that the juvenile will not commit further violations of law, and (5) there is reason to believe that the juvenile will comply with the conditions of probation.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 49;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 37;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 9.